ess.foma
!------------------------------
! progressive aspect postbases
!------------------------------
define Aqe       [ "^" "~" "(g)" {aqe} "(V→V)" ]; 
define Aqlaatagh [ "^" "~" "(g)" {aqlaatagh} "(V→V)" ];
define ProgressiveAspectPostbase [ Aqe | Aqlaatagh ];

!--------------------------------
! future / frustrative postbases
!--------------------------------
define Lleqe [ "^" "@" {lleqe} "(V→V)" ];
define Naagh [ "^" "@" "~f" {naagh} "(V→V)" ];
define Yagh  [ "^" "@" "~f" {yagh} "(V→V)" ];

!-----------------------------------
! evidential / imputative postbases
!-----------------------------------
define PeteFte [ "^" "+" "(pete)" {fte} "(V→V)" ];
define Ni      [ "^" "@" "~f" {ni} "(CmpdVbl)" ];

!-------------------------
! miscellaneous postbases
!-------------------------
define Ute [ "^" "@" "~" ":" "(u)" [ "(V→N)" | "(V→V)" ] ];


!~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
! 2. CO-OCCURRENCE RESTRICTIONS 
!    [ de Reuse (1994) p.116-123]
!~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~

!---------------------------------------------
! negative postbase co-occurence restrictions
!---------------------------------------------
define OnlyOneNeg ~[ ?* Negative ?* Nghite ?* ];

define HasLexicalizedForm ~[ ?* [Ma | Aqe | Lleqe] ?* Nghite ?* [ Concessive | Consequential | Contemporative     |
                                                                  Indicative | Participial   | ParticipialOblique |
                                                                  Precessive | Subordinative | Optative           ]
                           ];

define NegativeFilters [ OnlyOneNeg .o. HasLexicalizedForm ];

!-------------------------------------------------------------
! modal co-occurrence restrictions [de Reuse (1994) p.116-117]
!-------------------------------------------------------------
define ModalPast              ~[ ?* ModalPostbase ?* [Kau | Kaqe] ?* |
                                 ?* [Kayugu | Yaghqau | Yaghqaqe] ?* Ma ?* ];

define ModalProgressive       ~[ ?* Nayagh ?* [Aqe | Aqlaatagh] ?* ];

define ModalFutureFrustrative ~[ ?* Nayagh ?* [Lleqe | Naagh | Yagh] ?* ];

define ModalEvidential        ~[ ?* Nayagh ?* PeteFte ?* ];

define ModalMood              ~[ ?* Nayagh ?* Subordinative ?* |
                                 ?* [Kayugu | Nayagh | Yaghqau | Yaghqaqe] ?* [Optative | VolitiveOfFear] ?* ];

define ModalFilters [ ModalPast .o. ModalProgressive .o. ModalFutureFrustrative .o. ModalEvidential .o. ModalMood ];

!------------------------------------------------------------------
! past tense co-occurrence restrictions [de Reuse (1994) p.118-119]
!------------------------------------------------------------------
define PastFuture ~[ ?* PastTensePostbase ?* [Lleqe | Naagh] ?* ]; 

define PastMood   ~[ ?* [Kau | Kaqe] ?* [Optative | Conditional] ?* |
                     ?* Ma ?* Concessive ?* ];

define PastTenseFilters [ PastFuture .o. PastMood ];

!----------------------------------------------------------------------
! progressive aspect co-occurrence restrictions [de Reuse (1994) p.119]
!----------------------------------------------------------------------
define ProgressiveMood ~[ ?* ProgressiveAspectPostbase ?* [Optative | Conditional] ?* ]; 

define ProgressiveAspectFilters [ ProgressiveMood ];

!------------------------------------------------------------------------
! future / frustrative co-occurrence restrictions [de Reuse (1994) p.120]
!------------------------------------------------------------------------
define FutureEvidential ~[ ?* Naagh ?* PeteFte ?* ];

define FutureMood ~[ ?* Lleqe ?* [Subordinative | Conditional    | Consequential      |
                                  Concessive    | Contemporative | ParticipialOblique |
                                  Optative      | VolitiveOfFear ] ?* ];
define FrustrativeMood ~[ ?* Yagh ?* [Consequential | Contemporative | ParticipialOblique | Optative | VolitiveOfFear] ?* ]; 

define FutureFrustrativeFilters [ FutureEvidential .o. FutureMood .o. FrustrativeMood ];

!-------------------------------------------------------------------------------
! evidential / imputative co-occurrence restrictions [de Reuse (1994) p.120-121]
!-------------------------------------------------------------------------------
define EvidentialMood ~[ ?* PeteFte ?* [Subordinative      | Conditional    | Consequential |
                                        Concessive         | Contemporative | Participial   |
                                        ParticipialOblique | Optative       | VolitiveOfFear] ?* ];

define ImputativeMood ~[ ?* Ni ?* [Conditional | Contemporative | ParticipialOblique | Optative | VolitiveOfFear] ?* ];

define EvidentialImputativeFilters [ EvidentialMood .o. ImputativeMood ];

!-----------------------
! miscellaneous filters
!-----------------------
define DuplicateUteFilter ~[ ?* Ute ?* Ute ];


!~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
! 3. FILTER COMPOSITION
!~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
define Filters [ NegativeFilters             .o.
                 ModalFilters                .o.
                 PastTenseFilters            .o.
                 ProgressiveAspectFilters    .o.
                 FutureFrustrativeFilters    .o.
                 EvidentialImputativeFilters .o.
                 DuplicateUteFilter
               ];


!=======
! RULES
!=======

define Lowercase [ A:a | I:i | U:u | E:e |
                   P:p | T:t | K:k | Q:q |
                   L:l | Z:z | Y:y | R:r |
                   G:g | W:w | S:s | F:f |
                   S:s | M:m | N:n | "V":v ] ?* | ?* ;

define Uppercase [ a:A | i:I | u:U | e:E |
                   p:P | t:T | k:K | q:Q |
                   l:L | z:Z | y:Y | r:R |
                   g:G | w:W | s:S | f:F |
                   s:S | m:M | n:N | v:"V" ] ?* | ?* ;

define AllowUppercase [ "a" (<-) "A" ] .o. [ "i" (<-) "I" ] .o. [ "u" (<-) "U" ] .o. [ "e" (<-) "E" ] .o.
                      [ "p" (<-) "P" ] .o. [ "t" (<-) "T" ] .o. [ "k" (<-) "K" ] .o. [ "q" (<-) "Q" ] .o.
                      [ "l" (<-) "L" ] .o. [ "z" (<-) "Z" ] .o. [ "y" (<-) "Y" ] .o. [ "r" (<-) "R" ] .o.
                      [ "g" (<-) "G" ] .o. [ "w" (<-) "W" ] .o. [ "s" (<-) "S" ] .o. [ "f" (<-) "F" ] .o.
                      [ "s" (<-) "S" ] .o. [ "m" (<-) "M" ] .o. [ "n" (<-) "N" ] .o. [ "v" (<-) "V" ];

define AsciiArrow "(N→N)"           (->) "(N->N)"           ,,
                  "(N→V)"           (->) "(N->V)"           ,,
                  "(V→V)"           (->) "(V->V)"           ,,
                  "(V→N)"           (->) "(V->N)"           ,,
                  "(EMO→N)"         (->) "(EMO->N)"         ,,
                  "(EMO→V)"         (->) "(EMO->V)"         ,,
                  "(POS→STATIVE)"   (->) "(POS->STATIVE)"   ,,
                  "(POS→ACTIVE)"    (->) "(POS->ACTIVE)"    ,,
                  "(POS→QUANTQUAL)" (->) "(POS->QUANTQUAL)" ,,
                  "(DEM→N)"         (->) "(DEM->N)"         ,,
                  "(DEM→V)"         (->) "(DEM->V)"         ,,
                  "(NUM→N)"         (->) "(NUM->N)"         ,,
                  "(NUM→V)"         (->) "(NUM->V)"         ,,
                  "(N→QUANTQUAL)"   (->) "(N->QUANTQUAL)"   ,,
                  "(V→QUANTQUAL)"   (->) "(V->QUANTQUAL)"   ,,
                  "(N→PTCL)"        (->) "(N->PTCL)"        ,,
                  "(V→PTCL)"        (->) "(V->PTCL)"        ;
                  

define Minus2Hyphen "–" (->) "-" ;

define CurlyApostrophe "'" (->) "ʼ" ;

!----------------------------
! SANDHI & ORTHOGRAPHY RULES
!----------------------------
define CrossWordBoundaryGemination t   "(SANDHI)" -> s   .o.
                                   e g "(SANDHI)" -> e g .o.
                                   a g "(SANDHI)" -> a g .o.
                                   i g "(SANDHI)" -> i g .o.
                                   u g "(SANDHI)" -> u g .o.
                                   g h "(SANDHI)" -> g h ;

! NOTE: This overgenerates: "ugi(N)^[Rel.3SgPoss.Sg]" generates both "ugingan" and "ugwingan"
define GWAlternation g     <-       w   ,
                     g g   <-       w h ,
                     g h   <-   g h w   ,
                     g h h <- g h h w   || [ a | i ] u _ ~u           ,
                                                    ~u _  u [ a | i ] ;

! NOTE: This overgenerates: "sa(N)^~:(ng)u(N→V)^[Intrg.Intr.2Sg]" generates both "sanguzin" and "sanguziin"
define InterrogativeLengthening a (<-) a a || C _ (C) .#.           .o.
                                i (<-) i i || C _ (C) .#.           .o.
								u (<-) u u || C _ [(C) | (n g)] .#. .o.
								e (<-) a a || C _ C .#.             ;

! NOTE: This first implementation way overgenerates.
!       The second implementation is not ideal either...as of now, only noun roots ending in -a, -i, -u
!       can form vocatives, since I have not seen examples of how consonant-ending roots form vocatives (see noun_tags.txt)
!       Some demonstrative forms are permitted to form this -y vocative form as well (see demonstratives.txt).
!define Vocatives a <- a a y || _ .#. .o.
!                 i <- i i y || _ .#. .o.
!		          u <- u u y || _ .#. ;
define Vocatives a "[Voc]" -> a a y || _ .#. .o.
                 i "[Voc]" -> i i y || _ .#. .o.
                 u "[Voc]" -> u u y || _ .#. ;

define SandhiAndOrthography [ ! CurlyApostrophe             .o.
                              CrossWordBoundaryGemination .o.
                              GWAlternation               .o.
                              Vocatives
                            ];
! removing this rule for now:
!                             InterrogativeLengthening    .o.

!------------------------------
! E-DROPPING AND HOPPING RULES
!------------------------------

define FinalE %{%.f%.%} -> 0 || [ (C) C ("^") C & ~MultiCharC & ~[h h] & ~[(h) h w] ] e "^" _ [ MultiCharC | C ] .o. ! do not drop -e if it results in a CCC cluster
                                                                                                                     ! ~[h h] for puughhe(V)^@~fnaqe(V→V) [Badten p.657]
                                                                                                                     ! ~[h w] for aaghhwe(V)^@~fyug(V→V)
                                                                                                                     ! ("^") for ightugh(V)+qe(V→V)@~fnayuke(V→V)
              %{%.f%.%} -> 0 || C e "^" _ C e "^" %{%.f%.%} [ MultiCharC | C ]       .o. ! neqe(N)~f–ke(N→V)[Subr.Intr]
               [..] -> %{E%} || .#. ( MultiCharC | C ) FullVowel _ C e "^" %{%.f%.%} .o. ! hop final -e
                  e -> 0     || [? - .#.] [ MultiCharC | C ] _ "^" %{%.f%.%}         .o. ! drop final -e if it's not in the first syllable
          %{%.f%.%} -> 0                                                             ;


define SemiFinalE %{%.sf%.%} -> 0     || [ (C) C ("^") C & ~MultiCharC ] e g (h) "^" _                                     .o.
                        [..] -> %{E%} ||      .#. ( MultiCharC | C ) FullVowel _ [ MultiCharC | C ] e g (h) "^" %{%.sf%.%} .o.
                           e -> 0     ||        [ ? - .#. ] [ MultiCharC | C ] _ g (h) "^" %{%.sf%.%}                      .o.
                  %{%.sf%.%} -> 0                                                                                          ;


define ShortRootFinalE e -> a || .#. C (C) V C (C) _ "^" %{%.fS%.%} .o. ! [Jacobson (2001) p.38]
              %{%.fS%.%} -> 0                                       ;


define LongRootFinalE e -> 0 || [? - .#.] [ MultiCharC | C ] _ "^" %{%.fL%.%} .o. ! [Jacobson (2001) p.32] 
             %{%.fL%.%} -> 0                                                  ;


!-------------------------
! CONSONANT-RELATED RULES
!-------------------------
